dictsource/af_rules
//maintainer: Christo de Klerk
// email: christodeklerk@gmail.com
// tel: +27 28 822 2706
// Alberton, South Africa
// Originally created by Willem van der Walt
 

// 2-letter groups for:
// aa, an, ba, be, de, ee, en, ge, in, ka, ko, ma, me, mi, mo, on, oo, op, pa, pe, pr, re, se, st, te, tr, ui, ve, vo, we


.group a
         _C) a (Cie_     'A:
             ack (_       _^_EN //Jack and others.
          @) a (Cisasie   %a // fix a sound: akklimatisasie/meganisasie/penalisasie/polarisasie and many similar
          @) a (Ciseer    %a // fix a sound: akklimatiseer and many similar
          @) a (Cisering  %a // fix a sound: akklimatisering and many similar
             a            A:
         AC) a (_         %a // short final a in words like: Eva/Pieta/(su)sara
         %C) a (_         %a // short final a in words like: Bella/Betta/gogga
         &k) a (_         a // short final a in words like: Kafka/wodka
          s) ate (l       %at@ //satelliet and compounds
          C) a (rina      %a //unstressed short a in carina tarina etc.
         &b) a (_         %a // short final a: mamba and compounds/marimba/hamba
         &d) a (_         %a // short, unstressed a after d at end of word: soda/padda... and compounds
          i) a (_         %a // a short and unstressed in words ending in ia: laboratoria/millennia
        &rm) a (_         %a // shorten a sound: Irma/karma/firma and compounds
         &r) a (_         %a // short final a in words ending in -ra: infra/mantra/sentra, etc.
        Cbr) a (_         A: // long a: blommetjies-/kantbra
        &dr) a (_         A: // exceptwrds ending in -dra: ingedra/oorgedra, etc.
          _) a (lA        %a //short unstressed a for words starting with Al
          i) a (tieC      %a //words containing iatief/w short unstressed a
          i) a (ties  'A: //words containing iaties has stressed long a

        &vr) a (_         A: // and wrds ending in -vra: oorgevra/uitgevra/vasvra, etc.
         &t) a (_N        %a // short final a: basta/delta/junta/pasta/many names
             a (C         a
          C) a (Csier     %a // (ge)finansier/kassier
          j) a (pan       %a //japan first a sound and stress
          C) abie        'A:bi
          _) abo (C       %abO // move default stress and fix a and o sounds: abominasie/abonnement/aborsie
          _) a (bC        %a // abdy/ablatief/ablusie/abstrak, etc.
          _) a (bba       a // restore default stress: (ge)abba/abbamandjie, etc.
             abse (s      %apsE // fix stress and e sound: abses/-se
             abso (lu     %aps%u // fix stress, b and o sounds: absolusie/absolute
          _) adem         A:d@m // fix e sound: ademhaling/ademloos/ademteug
          @) adig        'A:d@x2 // misdadiger/gewelddadigheid/kragdadigheid
          C) adiu (K      A:diW // compounds of stadium/radium/radius
          C) a (Cia_      A: // stadia and compounds/Nadia and similar
             admi (r      %atm%i // move default stress: admiraal and compounds
             admi (ssie   %atmi // fix stress and i sound: admissie and compounds
             adolessen    %ad%o@l@sEn // fix stress and vowel sounds: adolessent/-e/-agtig/adolessensie
             ad (vies     %at // move default stress: advies/-brief/-komitee and many similar

             af (gunstig  %af // move default stress: afgunstig/-e
             aga (pant    %ag%a // fix g sound and stress: agapant/-e and compounds
          d) age (te      ax2_e@ // fix e sound, pause: sondag-/verjaardagete; handle dd: middagete
          C) agie        A:x2i
             a (gitA      %a // fix a sound: agitasie/(ge)agiteer
             agte (losig  %ax2t@ // move default stress: agtelosig/-e/-heid
             agter (dogt  %ax2t@r // move default stress: agterdogtig and derivatives
             agtereen (volg %ax2t@r_%e@n // move default stress: agtereenvolgend/-e/-ens
             agter (losig %ax2t@r // move default stress: agterlosig/-e/-heid
             agter (oor   %ax2t@r_ // move default stress: agteroor/-buig/-druk/-val, etc.
          &) agtig        'ax2t@x2 // this string almost always carries stress on a
             a (gurkie    %a // fix stress and a sound: agurkie/-s and compounds
         _C) ali (forni   %al@ // stress and vowel sounds: (C/K)alifornië/-niese
             ara (bi      %arA: // fix 1st a sound and stress: Arabië/Arabies/-e
             ara (bier    %ar%a // Stress and a sounds: Arabier/-e
          C) are (CA      A:r@ // e sound: amptenaredom/blaredak/garebiltong/haredos/jarelange
          K) ar (puis     %ar // fix stress: (h)arpuis and compounds
        Cel) ary          ar'eI // move default stress: bedelary/bottelary/dobbelary/huigelary/smokkelary...
 @@@smokkel) ary          %ar%eI // default stress: diamant-/drank-/dwelm-/goud-/kokaïensmokkelary, etc.
             amarula      %am%arul%a // fix stress and a sounds: amarula and compounds
             a (ment      %a // shorten a sound: perkament/testament and compounds
          _) arendag (CAC %A:r@ntax2 // fix e sound: arendagtig/-e/-heid   
             arends       A:r@nts_ // fix e sound: arendsoog/-kloue/-nes
             argen (tA    %arx2@n // move default stress: Argentinië/Argentyns/-e
             a (riA       'A: // akwarium/barium/estuarium/herbarium/seminaria
             a (ristokr   %a // shorten 1st a: aristokrasie/-kraat/-krate/-kraties
             arm (last    %ar@-m // move default stress: armlastig/-e
          C) asie        'A:si
       @@@@) asie         A:s%i
        C%C) asie         A:si // restore default stress: bok-/dikmelkkasie and similar
        oub) asie         A:si // restore default stress: oubasie/-s
      @form) asie         A:si // restore default stress to compounds ending in -formasie: graniet-/grond-/rotsformasie, etc.
         gl) asie         A:si // restore default stress: wyn-/sjampanjeglasie, etc.
         pl) asie         A:s%i // restore default stress: gemeenplasies/gemeenskapsplasies and similar
        @sp) asie         A:s%i // restore default stress: vloer/kantoorspasie/weggooispasie, etc.
        Cst) asie         A:si // restore default stress: brandweer/spoorwegstasie and similar
       AAst) asie         A:si // default stress: polisie/radio/televisie/uitsaaistasie, etc.
             aspek        %aspEk // fix stress and e sound: aspek/-te/-tief and compounds
             assosi (A    %as%o@S%i // fix stress and s sound: assosiasie/assosieer

             a (CAA       %a
          d) a (goggen    %a //saterdagoggend and friends
             ah (C        A: // lengthen a and drop h: Ahmed/Dahl/Mahler, etc.
             a (hle_      A: // Nguni names and words: kahle/pahle
             a (Cie       A: // apies/middagslapie
             a (Cy        %a
             a (CA        A:
             aka (de@     %ak@ // (sport-/leierskaps)akademie/akademies/akadeem/akademe
             akkedi       %ak@dI //akkedis and compounds
             akkommo (d   %ak%Om@ // fix stress and vowel sounds: akkommodasie/akkommodeer/-derend
             a (kkoord    %a // move default stress: akkoord/-e and compounds
             akku (ra     %ak%y // move default stress: akkuraat/akkurate
             ako (Ciet    %ak%u // fix stress and vowel sounds: akoliet/akoniet and compounds
             akro (ba     %akr%u // move default: akrobaat/-bate/-baties
             ak (syn      %ak // move default stress: aksyns and compounds
             aktuari (A   %akt%y%ar%i // fix stress and vowel sounds: aktuarieel/-ële
             akwama (ryn  %akw%am%a // move default stress: akwamaryn and compounds
          _) a (kwat      %a // move default stress: akwaties/-e
             akware (l    %akw%ar& // fix stress and e sound: akwarel/-le
             ae           A:       //should be A:@ but sounds wrong
          t) abel         %ab&l //tabelopskrif temperatuurtabel etc.
      spekt) abel         'A:b@l // respektabel/-e/-heid/-ste
          t) abell        %ab&l //tabelle fix double l 
          w) a (tering A: //watering exception to the rest
          C) a (tering %a //short unstressed a before tering formatering etc. except watering
         @C) a (tief      %a // fix a sound: akkumulatief/negatief and many similar
         @m) a (tiek      %a // shorten a sound: diplomatiek/dogmatiek/problematiek/sistematiek/-e
        tam) a (tiek      A: // but fix stress and a sound: tamatiekelkie/-konfyt/-kultivar
         @C) a (tiewe     %a // fix a sound: konserwatiewe/putatiewe and many similar
       _arC) ad (A        'A:d // Arcadia/arkadia/arkade/armada
             ai           aI
             aine (_      _^_FR // words ending in aine are French: Verlainee/migraine, etc.
          @) aire (_      _^_FR
             adre (K      %adrE // fix last e sound of adres as last part of compounds
             adrena (li   %adr@n%a // fix stress and vowel sounds: adrenalien and compounds
             al (baster   %al // move default stress: albaster and compounds
             al (bino     %al // move default stress: albino
             alche (mi    %alx2%e@ // move default stress: alchemis and derivatives/alchemie
             aleksand (ry %al%Eks%and // fix stress and a and d sounds: aleksandryn/-e/-s
             alex (a      %al%Ekz // Alexander/Alexandra/Alexandria
             alfabe (tK   alfabE // fix stress and e sound: (vinger)alfabet/-te
             alfabe (tA   %alf%abe@ // fix stress and e sound: alfabeties/-e/alfabetiseer
             alge (ryn    %alx2@ // move default stress: Algeryn/-e/-s
             alia         A:l%i%a // fix stress and a sound: alias/-se/(inter )alia
          _) ali (krA     al%i // fix vowel sounds: alikreukel/alikruik/alikruk
             al (jander   %al // move default stress: aljander and compounds
             alkohol      alk%u%Ol // fix o sounds and drop h: alkohol/-is/-iste/-isme
             alkohol (ieK %alk%uho@l // fix stress and 2nd o sound: alkoholies/-e
          _) alle (C      al@ // alledaags/e/allerhande
             alle (mint   %al@ // move default stress: allemintig/-e
          _) a (llooi     %a // move default stress: allooi(metaal/-silwer, etc.)
             alma (nak    %alm%a // move default stress: almanak/-ke and compounds
             alogie       alux2'i // genealogie/mineralogie and similar
             alogies      al'o@x2is // genealogies/mineralogies and similar
             aloog        al'o@x2 // genealoog/mineraloog and similar
             aloë         al'u@ // genealoë/mineraloë and similar
          _) alom (@      al?Om // shorten a sound: alombekend, etc.
             alu (minium  %al%u // move stress: aluminium and compounds
          _) al (we       %al // stress: alweer/alwetend/-heid
             amasone      %am%aso@n@ // fix stress and vowel sounds: amasone/-rivier/-steen
             ammo (niA    %amo@ // fix stress and o sound: ammoniak and compounds/ammonium and compounds
         _k) a (nA        %a //kanon and others
